it: affilatura della lama: Smussata/non affilata; Parzialmente affilata; Affilata; Altro
sl-SI: Ostrina rezila: Topo/nenabrušeno; Delno nabrušeno; Ostro; Drugo
ro-RO: Ascuțimea lamei: Tocită/neascuțită; Parțial ascuțită; Ascuțită; Altele
ja: 刃の鋭さ: ブラント / 未研磨; 部分研磨; シャープ; その他
ko: 블레이드 날카로움 수준: 무딘/연마되지 않음; 부분 연마; 날카로움; 기타
es: Filo de la cuchilla: Roma/sin afilar; Parcialmente afilada; Afilada; Otro
th: ความคมของใบมีด: ทื่อ/ไม่ลับคม; ลับคมบางส่วน; คม; อื่นๆ
de: Klingenschärfe: Stumpf/ungeschärft; Teilweise geschärft; Scharf; Sonstige
hr-HR: Oštrina oštrice: Tupa/Nenaoštrena; Djelomično naoštrena; Oštra; Ostalo
pl: Ostrość ostrza: Tępe / nienaostrzone; Częściowo naostrzone; Ostre; Inne
zh-CN: 刀刃锋利度: 钝口/未开刃; 部分开刃; 锋利; 其他
el: Αιχμηρότητα της λεπίδας: Στομωμένη/Μη ακονισμένη; Μερικώς ακονισμένη; Ακονισμένη; Άλλο
hu: Pengeélesség: Tompa / élezetlen; Részben élezett; Éles; Egyéb
bg-BG: Острота на острието: Тъпо/ненаточено; Частично наточено; Остро; Други
sv: Bladets skärpa: Trubbig/oslipad; Delvis slipad; Vass; Övrigt
lt-LT: Ašmenų aštrumas: Bukas / nepagaląstas; Iš dalies pagaląstas; Aštrus; Kita
sk-SK: Ostrosť čepele: Tupá/nenaostrená; Čiastočne naostrená; Ostrá; Iné
en: Blade sharpness: Blunt/unsharpened; Partially sharpened; Sharp; Other
cs: Ostrost nože: Tupé / nenabroušené; Částečně nabroušené; Ostré; Jiné
da: Bladets skarphed: Sløv/usleben; Delvist sleben; Skarp; Andet
nb: Bladskarphet: Sløv / uslipt; Delvis slipt; Skarp; Annet
ru: Острота лезвия: Тупое / незаточенное; Частично заточенное; Острое; Другое
pt-PT: Afiação da lâmina: Romba/não afiada; Parcialmente afiada; Afiada; Outros
fi: Lavan terävyys: Tylppä/teroittamaton; Osittain teroitettu; Terävä; Muu
vi: Độ sắc bén của lưỡi: Cùn/không sắc; Sắc một phần; Sắc; Khác
fr: Tranchant de la lame: Émoussée/non aiguisée; Partiellement aiguisée; Aiguisée; Autre
tr: Bıçak keskinliği: Kör/keskinleştirilmemiş; Kısmen keskinleştirilmiş; Keskin; Diğer
nl: Blad scherpte: Bot/ongeslepen; Gedeeltelijk geslepen; Scherp; Anders
zh-TW: 刀片鋒利度: 鈍刃/未開鋒; 部分開鋒; 鋒利; 其他
pt-BR: Afiação da lâmina: Sem fio/não afiado; Parcialmente afiado; Afiado; Outro